District of Columbia statutes.
44-1952

Repealed

Annual reports.

Repealed.

May 13, 1977, D.C. Law 1-134, title V, § 502, 24 DCR 406
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-212, § 402, 43 DCR 4962
1981 Ed., § 32-252.
1973 Ed., § 32-1352.
See notes following § 44-1901.

D.C. Law 1-134, title V, § 502, eff. May 13, 1977, added this section.

D.C. Law 11-212, title IV, § 402 ( 43 DCR 4962), eff. April 9, 1997, provided: “The D.C. General Hospital Commission Act, effective May 13, 1977 (D.C. Law 1-134; D.C. Code § 32-201 et seq. [1981 Ed.]), is repealed.”

Title V, § 501(c) of D.C. Law 11-212, provided: “(c) Section 402 shall become effective upon the first meeting of the Board pursuant to section 204(h).”

D.C. Law 11-259, title III, § 315(b) ( 44 DCR 1423), eff. April 15, 1997, also repealed § 32-251 [1981 Ed.].